North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15 Education
CHAPTER 15-18 Junior Colleges

15-18-01.
Junior colleges authorized. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 192, § 15.

15-18-02.
Election to establish junior college. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 192, § 15.

15-18-03.
School district tax levy authorized to finance residual or other junior college fiscal obligations. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 154, § 2.

15-18-04.
Supervision of junior colleges. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 192, § 15.

15-18-04.1.
Establishment of off-campus educational center — Tuition and fees — Use of tuition and fee revenue. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 192, § 15.

15-18-04.2.
School district tax levy authorized to finance residual or other off-campus educational center obligations. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 154, § 2.

15-18-05.
County levy to aid in the financing of residual or other fiscal obligations of a junior college or educational center authorized. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 154, § 2.

15-18-06.
Proceeds of levy to be certified to special school district.

The proceeds of any tax levy hereby authorized must be certified quarterly to the clerk of any special school district which maintained a junior college or off-campus educational center pursuant to this chapter as it existed on June 30, 1984. The proceeds must be placed in a special junior college fund or an off-campus center fund and must be used to finance any residual or other fiscal obligations of the special school district under the terms of an agreement between the district and the state board of higher education.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 127, § 3; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 15-1806; S.L. 1961, ch. 155, § 2; 1975, ch. 144, § 5; 1983, ch. 192, § 11; 2001, ch. 55, § 6.

15-18-07.
State aid for community or junior colleges or educational centers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 192, § 15.

15-18-08.
Standards for state aid — Review of budgets — Audit of expenditures. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 192, § 15.

15-18-09.
Method of payment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 192, § 15.

15-18-10.
Junior college boards of control — Expenditures — Budget — Members — Terms — Compensation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 192, § 15.

15-18-11.
Curtis and Annette Hofstad agricultural center.

The agricultural center constructed on the campus of Lake Region state college is officially named the Curtis and Annette Hofstad agricultural center.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 3, § 14, effective July 1, 2019.